Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.475

International medical graduates—Grant funding.

Subject to appropriation by the legislature and donations received from public and private entities, the department of health shall award grant funding to:

(1) Approved entities for career guidance and support services to international medical graduates including, but not limited to, assistance with educational commission for foreign medical graduates certification application and United States medical licensing examination preparation; and

(2) Health care facilities or clinical programs to provide supervised clinical training to international medical graduates.

[ 2020 c 325 s 3.]